Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-339
Pickle card or pickle card unit; department; examination.

In addition to any other authority of the department and its authorized agents to conduct inspections, the department and its agents shall have the authority to select any pickle card or pickle card unit held by a distributor, licensed organization, sales agent, pickle card operator, or manufacturer and to examine the quality and integrity of such card or unit in any manner, including pulling all chances remaining thereon. If the pickle card or pickle card unit so inspected is thereby altered in any manner and no defect, alteration, deceptive condition, or other violation is discovered, the owner shall be reimbursed by the department for the cost of the pickle card or pickle card unit and the pickle card or pickle card unit shall become property of the department.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 22;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-186.04;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 105.